Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Duties and Liabilities of Trustees

386.705.
General duties not limited. [Repealed.]

386.710.
Standard of care and performance. [Repealed.]

386.715.
Duty to inform and account to beneficiaries. [Repealed.]

386.720.
Duty to provide surety on bond. [Repealed.]

386.725.
Appropriate place of administration — Deviation. [Repealed.]

386.730.
Personal liability of trustee to third parties. [Repealed.]

386.735.
Limitations on proceedings against trustees after final account. [Repealed.]

386.740.
Power of fiduciary to use assets to prevent or remedy environmental violations — Limitation of personal liability of fiduciary. [Repealed.]